test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_kaahus_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kááhuš: # MLO, ok
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Nom: kááhuš
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Gen: kahhuu
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Acc: kahhuu
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Ill: kahhuužân
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Loc: kahhuust
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Com: kahhuin
    kááhuš+N+Sg+Abe: kahhuuttáá
    kááhuš+N+Ess: káhužin
    kááhuš+N+Par: káhužid
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Nom: kahhuuh
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Gen: kahhui
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Acc: kahhuid
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Ill: kahhuid
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Loc: kahhuin
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Com: kahhuiguin
    kááhuš+N+Pl+Abe: kahhuittáá

  Noun - ááhuš: # MLO, checked
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Nom: ááhuš
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Gen: ahhuu
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Acc: ahhuu
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Ill: ahhuužân
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Loc: ahhuust
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Com: ahhuin
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Abe: ahhuuttáá
    ááhuš+N+Ess: áhužin
    ááhuš+N+Par: áhužid
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Nom: ahhuuh
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Gen: ahhui
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Acc: ahhuid
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Ill: ahhuid
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Loc: ahhuin
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Com: ahhuiguin
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Abe: ahhuittáá


  Noun - kiärtuš: # MLO: this is a neologism, so it is difficult to say whether this is the correct inflection but it is at least according to the normal sound change model; I have only seen sg Nom in use
    kiärtuš+N+Sg+Nom: kiärtuš
#    kiärtuš+N+Sg+Gen: kerttuu
#    kiärtuš+N+Sg+Acc: kerttuu
#    kiärtuš+N+Sg+Ill: kerttuužân
#    kiärtuš+N+Sg+Loc: kerttuust
#    kiärtuš+N+Sg+Com: kerttuin
#    kiärtuš+N+Sg+Abe: kerttuuttáá
#    kiärtuš+N+Ess: kiärtužin
#    kiärtuš+N+Par: kiärtužid
#    kiärtuš+N+Pl+Nom: kerttuuh
#    kiärtuš+N+Pl+Gen: kerttui
#    kiärtuš+N+Pl+Acc: kerttuid
#    kiärtuš+N+Pl+Ill: kerttuid
#    kiärtuš+N+Pl+Loc: kerttuin
#    kiärtuš+N+Pl+Com: kerttuiguin
#    kiärtuš+N+Pl+Abe: kerttuittáá
    
  Noun - siiskiš: # MLO, ok
    siiskiš+N+Sg+Nom: siiskiš
    siiskiš+N+Sg+Gen: siskii
    siiskiš+N+Sg+Acc: siskii
    siiskiš+N+Sg+Ill: siskiižân
    siiskiš+N+Sg+Loc: siskiist
    siiskiš+N+Sg+Com: siskijn
    siiskiš+N+Sg+Abe: siskiittáá
    siiskiš+N+Ess: siskižin
    siiskiš+N+Par: siskižid
    siiskiš+N+Pl+Nom: siskiih
    siiskiš+N+Pl+Gen: siskij
    siiskiš+N+Pl+Acc: siskijd
    siiskiš+N+Pl+Ill: siskijd
    siiskiš+N+Pl+Loc: siskijn
    siiskiš+N+Pl+Com: siskijguin
    siiskiš+N+Pl+Abe: siskijttáá
